North Dakota statutes. TITLE 19 Foods, Drugs, Oils, and Compounds
CHAPTER 19-03.1 Uniform Controlled Substances Act
19-03.1-25.
Prohibited acts C — Penalties.

It is unlawful for any person:

To distribute as a registrant a controlled substance classified in schedule I or II, except pursuant to an order form as required by section 19-03.1-21;

To use in the course of the manufacture or distribution of a controlled substance a registration number which is fictitious, revoked, suspended, or issued to another person;

To acquire or obtain possession of a controlled substance by misrepresentation, fraud, forgery, deception, or subterfuge;

To furnish false or fraudulent material information in, or omit any material information from, any application, report, or other document required to be kept or filed under this chapter, or any record required to be kept by this chapter; or

To make, distribute, or possess any punch, die, plate, stone, or other thing designed to print, imprint, or reproduce the trademark, trade name, or other identifying mark, imprint, or device of another or any likeness of any of the foregoing upon any drug or container or labeling thereof so as to render the drug a counterfeit substance.

Any person who violates this section is guilty of a class C felony.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 25; 1975, ch. 106, § 170.

Collateral References.

Fraud or deceit: construction of provision of Uniform Narcotic Drug Act or similar statute dealing with obtaining or procuring the administration of a narcotic drug by fraud or deceit, 25 A.L.R.3d 1118.

Propriety of lesser included offense charge in state prosecution of narcotics defendant-Marijuana cases,1 A.L.R.6th 549.

Propriety of lesser included offense charge in state prosecution of narcotics defendant-Cocaine cases, 2 A.L.R.6th 551.

What constitutes “Aggravated Felony” for which alien can be deported or removed under § 237(a)(2)(A)(iii) of Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. § 1227(a)(2)(A)(iii)) — Marijuana offenses under
8 U.S.C. § 1101(a)(43)(B),
76 A.L.R. Fed. 2d 1.

What constitutes
“Aggravated Felony” for which alien can be deported
or removed under § 237(a)(2)(A)(iii) of Immigration and Nationality
Act (8 U.S.C. § 1227(a)(2)(A)(iii)) — Cocaine and crack cocaine offenses under
8 U.S.C. § 1101(a)(43)(B),
76 A.L.R. Fed. 2d 61.

What constitutes “Aggravated Felony” for which alien can be deported or removed under § 237(a)(2)(A)(iii) of the Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. § 1227(a)(2)(A)(iii)) — Heroin offenses under
8 U.S.C. § 1101(a)(43)(B),
78 A.L.R. Fed. 2d 133.

What constitutes “Aggravated Felony” for which aliens can be deported or removed under § 237(a)(2)(A)(iii) of the Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. § 1227(a)(2)(A)(iii)) — Illicit methamphetamine offenses under
8 U.S.C. § 1101(a)(43)(B),
78 A.L.R. Fed. 2d 151.

What constitutes “Aggravated Felony” for which alien can be deported or removed under § 237(a)(2)(A)(iii) of Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. § 1227(a)(2)(A)(iii)) — Miscellaneous or unspecified narcotics offenses under
8 U.S.C. § 1101(a)(43)(B),
79 A.L.R. Fed. 2d 335.

19-03.1-26.
Disposing of needles and paraphernalia — Penalty.

Any registrant who shall use, administer, or dispense or cause to be used, administered, or dispensed any drug or controlled substance in a manner requiring the use of any type of syringe, needle, eyedropper, or other similar paraphernalia shall destroy and dispose of said syringe, needle, eyedropper, or other similar paraphernalia in a manner that will prevent its reuse by any person other than the registrant. The board may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 28-32 setting out the specific manner in which the provisions of this section must be carried out. Any registrant who violates the provisions of this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 26; 1975, ch. 106, § 171; 1981, ch. 336, § 11; 1985, ch. 262, § 20.

19-03.1-27.
Penalties under other laws.

Any penalty imposed for violation of this chapter is in addition to, and not in lieu of, any civil or administrative penalty or sanction otherwise authorized by law.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 27.

Collateral References.

Validity, construction, and application of state laws imposing tax or license fee on possession, sale, or the like, of illegal narcotics, 12 A.L.R.5th 89.

19-03.1-28.
Bar to prosecution.

If a violation of this chapter is a violation of a federal law or the law of another state, a conviction or acquittal under federal law or the law of another state for the same act is a bar to prosecution in this state.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 28.

19-03.1-29.
Distribution to persons under age eighteen. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

19-03.1-30.
Conditional discharge for possession as first offense. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 196, § 4.

19-03.1-31.
Second or subsequent offenses. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

19-03.1-32.
Powers of enforcement personnel — Search warrants.

Any officer of the bureau of criminal investigation designated by the attorney general of this state may:

Carry firearms in the performance of official duties.

Execute and serve search warrants, arrest warrants, administrative inspection warrants, subpoenas, and summonses issued under the authority of this state.

Make arrests without warrant for any offense under this chapter committed in the officer’s presence, or if the officer has probable cause to believe that the person to be arrested has committed or is committing a violation of this chapter which may constitute a felony.

Make seizures of property pursuant to this chapter.

Perform other law enforcement duties as the attorney general designates.

A search warrant relating to offenses involving controlled substances may be issued and executed at any time of the day or night, if the judge or magistrate issuing the warrant so specifies in the warrant.

Any officer authorized to execute a search warrant, without notice of the officer’s authority and purpose, may break open an outer or inner door or window of a building, or any part of the building, or anything therein, if the judge or magistrate issuing the warrant has probable cause to believe that if such notice were to be given the property sought in the case may be easily and quickly destroyed or disposed of, or that danger to the life or limb of the officer or another may result, and has included in the warrant a direction that the officer executing it is not required to give such notice. Any officers acting under such warrant, as soon as practicable after entering the premises, shall identify themselves and state the purpose of entering the premises and the authority for doing so.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 32; 1979, ch. 289, § 1; 1979, ch. 540, § 3; 1985, ch. 258, § 23; 2009, ch. 125, § 2.

Cross-References.

Execution of search warrant, use of force, see N.D.C.C. § 29-29-08.

19-03.1-33.
Administrative inspections and warrants.

Issuance and execution of administrative inspection warrants must be as follows:

A district judge within a district judge’s jurisdiction, and upon proper oath or affirmation showing probable cause, may issue warrants for the purpose of conducting administrative inspections authorized by this chapter or rules hereunder and seizures of property appropriate to the inspections. For purposes of the issuance of administrative inspection warrants, probable cause exists upon showing a valid public interest in the effective enforcement of this chapter or rules thereunder, sufficient to justify administrative inspection of the area, premises, building, or conveyance in the circumstances specified in the application for the warrant.

A warrant may issue only upon an affidavit of a designated officer or employee having knowledge of the facts alleged, sworn to before the judge or magistrate and establishing the grounds for issuing the warrant. If the judge or magistrate is satisfied that grounds for the application exist or that there is probable cause to believe they exist, the judge or magistrate shall issue a warrant identifying the area, premises, building, or conveyance to be inspected, the purpose of the inspection, and, if appropriate, the type of property to be inspected, if any. The warrant must:

State the grounds for its issuance and the name of each person whose affidavit has been taken in support thereof;

Be directed to a person authorized to execute it;

Command the person to whom it is directed to inspect the area, premises, building, or conveyance identified for the purpose specified and, if appropriate, direct the seizure of the property specified;

Identify the item or types of property to be seized, if any; and

Direct that it be served during normal business hours and designate the judge or magistrate to whom it shall be returned.

A warrant issued pursuant to this section must be executed and returned within ten days of its date unless, upon a showing of a need for additional time, the court orders otherwise. If property is seized pursuant to a warrant, a copy must be given to the person from whom or from whose premises the property is taken, together with a receipt for the property taken. The return of the warrant must be made promptly, accompanied by a written inventory of any property taken. The inventory must be made in the presence of the person executing the warrant and of the person from whose possession or premises the property was taken, if present, or in the presence of at least one credible person other than the person executing the warrant. A copy of the inventory must be delivered to the person from whom or from whose premises the property was taken and to the applicant for the warrant.

The judge or magistrate who has issued a warrant shall attach thereto a copy of the return and all papers returnable in connection therewith and file them with the clerk of the district court for the county in which the inspection was made.

The board may make administrative inspections of controlled premises in accordance with the following provisions:

For purposes of this section only, “controlled premises” means:

Places where persons registered or exempted from registration requirements under this chapter are required to keep records; and

Places, including factories, warehouses, establishments, and conveyances in which persons registered or exempted from registration requirements under this chapter are permitted to hold, manufacture, compound, process, sell, deliver, or otherwise dispose of any controlled substance.

When authorized by an administrative inspection warrant issued pursuant to subsection 1, an officer or employee designated by the board, upon presenting the warrant and appropriate credentials to the owner, operator, or agent in charge, may enter controlled premises for the purpose of conducting an administrative inspection.

When authorized by an administrative inspection warrant, an officer or employee designated by the board may:

Inspect and copy records required by this chapter to be kept;

Inspect, within reasonable limits and in a reasonable manner, controlled premises and all pertinent equipment, finished and unfinished material, containers and labeling found therein, and, except as provided in subdivision e, all other things therein, including records, files, papers, processes, controls, and facilities bearing on violation of this chapter; and

Inventory any stock of any controlled substance therein and obtain samples thereof.

This section does not prevent the inspection without a warrant of books and records pursuant to an administrative subpoena issued in accordance with section 28-32-33, nor does it prevent entries and administrative inspections, including seizures of property, without a warrant:

If the owner, operator, or agent in charge of the controlled premises consents;

In situations presenting imminent danger to health or safety;

In situations involving inspection of conveyances if there is reasonable cause to believe that the mobility of the conveyance makes it impracticable to obtain a warrant;

In any other exceptional emergency circumstances in which time or opportunity to apply for a warrant is lacking; or

In all other situations in which a warrant is not constitutionally required.

An inspection authorized by this section may not extend to financial data, sales data, other than shipment data, or pricing data unless the owner, operator, or agent in charge of the controlled premises consents in writing.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 33; 1985, ch. 258, § 24; 1985, ch. 262, § 21; 2001, ch. 293, § 6.

19-03.1-34.
Injunctions.

The district courts of this state shall have jurisdiction to restrain or enjoin violations of this chapter.

The defendant may demand trial by jury for an alleged violation of an injunction or restraining order under this section.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 34.

19-03.1-35.
Cooperative arrangements and confidentiality.

The board shall cooperate with federal and other state agencies in discharging its responsibilities concerning traffic in controlled substances and in suppressing the abuse of controlled substances. To this end, it may:

Arrange for exchange of information among governmental officials concerning the use and abuse of controlled substances.

Coordinate and cooperate in training programs concerning controlled substance law enforcement at local and state levels.

Cooperate with the bureau by establishing a centralized unit to accept, catalog, file, and collect statistics, including records of drug-dependent persons and other controlled substance law offenders within the state, and make the information available for federal, state, and local law enforcement purposes. It may not furnish the name or identity of a patient or research subject whose identity could not be obtained under subsection 3.

Conduct programs of eradication aimed at destroying wild or illicit growth of plant species from which controlled substances may be extracted.

Results, information, and evidence received from the bureau relating to regulatory functions of this chapter, including results of inspections conducted by it, may be relied and acted upon by the board in the exercise of its regulatory functions under this chapter.

A practitioner engaged in medical practice or research is not required or compelled to furnish the name or identity of a patient or research subject to the board nor may the practitioner be compelled in any state or local civil, criminal, administrative, legislative, or other proceedings to furnish the name or identity of an individual that the practitioner is obligated to keep confidential.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 35; 1979, ch. 289, § 2; 1985, ch. 258, § 25; 1985, ch. 262, § 22.

19-03.1-36.
Forfeitures.

The following are subject to forfeiture:

All controlled substances which have been manufactured, distributed, dispensed, or acquired in violation of this chapter.

All imitation controlled substances as defined by sections 19-03.2-01 and 19-03.2-02.

All raw materials, products, and equipment of any kind which are used, or intended for use, in manufacturing, compounding, processing, delivering, importing, or exporting any controlled substance in violation of this chapter.

All property which is used, or intended for use, as a container for property described in subdivision a, b, or c.

All conveyances, including aircraft, vehicles, or vessels, which are used, or intended for use, to transport, or in any manner to facilitate the transportation, for the purpose of sale or receipt of property described in subdivision a, b, or c, but:

No conveyance used by any person as a common carrier in the transaction of business as a common carrier is subject to forfeiture under this section unless it appears that the owner or other person in charge of the conveyance is a consenting party or privy to a violation of this chapter.

No conveyance is subject to forfeiture under this section by reason of any act or omission established by the owner thereof to have been committed or omitted without the owner’s knowledge or consent.

A conveyance is not subject to forfeiture for a violation of subsection 7 of section 19-03.1-23 or subsection 3 of section 19-03.2-03.

A forfeiture of a conveyance encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if the secured party neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or omission.

All books, records, and research products and materials, including formulas, microfilm, tapes, and data which are used, or intended for use, in violation of this chapter.

All drug paraphernalia as defined in chapter 19-03.4.

All money, coin, currency, and everything of value furnished, or intended to be furnished, in exchange for a controlled substance in violation of this chapter or an imitation controlled substance in violation of chapter 19-03.2, and all real and personal property, assets, profits, income, proceeds, or an interest therein, acquired or derived from the unlawful purchase, attempted purchase, delivery, attempted delivery, manufacturing, or attempted manufacturing of any controlled substance or imitation controlled substance.

Property subject to forfeiture under this chapter, except conveyances, may be seized by the board upon process issued by any district court having jurisdiction over the property. A conveyance subject to forfeiture under this chapter may be seized by a state, county, or city law enforcement agency upon process issued by any district court having jurisdiction over the conveyance. Seizure without process may be made if:

The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search warrant or an inspection under an administrative inspection warrant.

The property subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior judgment in favor of the state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture proceedings based upon this chapter.

The board or a law enforcement agency has probable cause to believe that the property is directly or indirectly dangerous to health or safety.

The board or a law enforcement agency has probable cause to believe that the property was used or is intended to be used in violation of this chapter.

In the event of seizure pursuant to subsection 2, proceedings under subsection 4 must be instituted promptly.

Property taken or detained under this section is not subject to replevin, but is deemed to be in custody of the board or a law enforcement agency subject only to the orders and decrees of the district court having jurisdiction over the forfeiture proceedings as set out in subsection 2. When property is seized under this chapter, the board or a law enforcement agency may:

Place the property under seal.

Remove the property to a place designated by it.

Require the attorney general to take custody of the property and remove it to an appropriate location for disposition in accordance with law.

When property is forfeited under this chapter, the board or a law enforcement agency may:

Retain it for official use or transfer the custody or ownership of any forfeited property to any federal, state, or local agency. The board shall ensure the equitable transfer of any forfeited property to the appropriate federal, state, or local law enforcement agency so as to reflect generally the contribution of that agency participating directly in any of the acts that led to the seizure or forfeiture of the property. A decision to transfer the property is not subject to review.

Sell that which is not required to be destroyed by law and which is not harmful to the public. The proceeds must be used for payment of all proper expenses of the proceedings for forfeiture and sale, including expenses of seizure, maintenance of custody, advertising, and court costs, with any remaining proceeds to be deposited, subject to section 54-12-14, in the appropriate state, county, or city general fund. When two or more law enforcement agencies are involved in seizing a conveyance, the remaining proceeds may be divided proportionately.

Require the attorney general to take custody of property and remove it for disposition in accordance with law.

Forward it to the bureau for disposition.

Use the property, including controlled substances, imitation controlled substances, and plants forfeited under subsections 6 and 7, in enforcement of this chapter. However, in a case involving the delivery of a forfeited controlled substance by a law enforcement officer or a person acting as an agent of a law enforcement officer, no prosecution or conviction for simple possession of a controlled substance under subsection 5 of section 19-03.1-23 may be based upon the forfeited controlled substances supplied by the law enforcement officer or the officer’s agent.

Controlled substances as defined in this chapter and imitation controlled substances as defined in chapter 19-03.2 that are possessed, transferred, sold, or offered for sale in violation of this chapter and drug paraphernalia as defined in chapter 19-03.4 are contraband and must be seized and summarily forfeited to the state. Controlled substances as defined in this chapter and imitation controlled substances as defined in chapter 19-03.2, which are seized or come into the possession of the state and drug paraphernalia as defined in chapter 19-03.4, the owners of which are unknown, are contraband and must be summarily forfeited to the state.

Species of plants from which controlled substances in schedules I and II may be derived which have been planted or cultivated in violation of this chapter, or of which the owners or cultivators are unknown, or which are wild growths, may be seized and summarily forfeited to the state.

The failure, upon demand by the board, or its authorized agent, of the person in occupancy or in control of land or premises upon which the species of plants are growing or being stored to produce an appropriate registration, or proof that the person is the holder thereof, constitutes authority for the seizure and forfeiture of the plants.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 36; 1979, ch. 290, § 1; 1981, ch. 160, § 7; 1983, ch. 256, § 1; 1983, ch. 257, § 4; 1985, ch. 82, § 33; 1985, ch. 258, § 26; 1985, ch. 262, § 3; 1987, ch. 266, § 1; 1989, ch. 268, § 1; 1993, ch. 221, § 1; 1995, ch. 54, § 10; 2001, ch. 214, § 6; 2003, ch. 48, § 11; 2003, ch. 184, §§ 2, 3; 2017, ch. 164, §§
9, 10, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 187, §§ 4, 5, effective August 1, 2019.

Note.

Section 19-03.1-36 was amended 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 5 of Chapter 187, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1183; and Section 4 of Chapter 187, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1183.

19-03.1-36.1.
Manner of forfeiture.

Property subject to forfeiture under this chapter, other than property that may be summarily forfeited, may be forfeited by order of a district court only after:

A written consent to forfeiture executed by the owner of the property and all persons with a legal interest in the property to be forfeited has been filed with the court; or

Commencement of forfeiture proceedings.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 268, § 2.

Collateral References.

Forfeitability of property, under uniform controlled substances act or similar statute, where property or evidence supporting forfeiture was illegally seized, 1 A.L.R.5th 346.

Application of forfeiture provisions of uniform controlled substances act or similar statute where drugs were possessed for personal use, 1 A.L.R.5th 375.

Burden of proof and presumptions in tracing currency, bank account, or cash equivalent to illegal drug trafficking so as to permit forfeiture, or declaration as contraband, under state law, 104 A.L.R.5th 229.

19-03.1-36.2.
Forfeiture proceeding as civil action — Standard of proof.

Forfeiture proceedings are civil actions against the property to be forfeited and the standard of proof is clear and convincing evidence.

Forfeiture proceedings are separate and distinct from any related criminal action, and may not be initiated until the owner of the property has been convicted of or pled guilty to a criminal offense, or the individual has died, fled the jurisdiction, been deported by the United States government, been granted immunity or a reduced sentence in exchange for testifying or assisting a law enforcement investigation or prosecution, has abandoned the property, or it can be established beyond a reasonable doubt the property was used in the commission of a crime or constituted the proceeds of criminal activity. As used in this subsection, “abandoned the property” or “fled the jurisdiction” means for a period of more than one year, the owner has not responded to any of the reasonable efforts made by the seizing agency to contact the owner or has not contacted the seizing agency.

Two or more law enforcement agencies and courts from different jurisdictions may coordinate, cooperate, and engage in interjurisdictional prosecution under this section.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 268, § 3; 2019, ch. 189, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

19-03.1-36.3.
Summons and complaint for forfeiture of property — Contents of complaint — Notice.

When property described in subsection 1 of section 19-03.1-36 is to be forfeited, other than property described in subsection 6 of section 19-03.1-36, and in the absence of a written consent to forfeiture, forfeiture proceedings must be commenced by the filing of a summons and complaint for forfeiture of the property in the district court of the county in which the property was seized, is being held, or is located. In the case of real property, the summons and complaint must be filed in the county in which the real property, or some part of the real property, is located. The proceedings must be brought in the name of the state. The complaint must describe the property, state its location, state its present custodian, state the name of each owner if known, state the name of each party with a legal interest in the property if known or of legal record, allege the essential elements of the violation that is claimed to exist, and must conclude with a prayer to enforce the forfeiture. Notice of the forfeiture proceedings must be given to each known owner and known person with a legal interest in the property to be forfeited by serving a copy of the summons and complaint in accordance with the North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure. The procedure governing the proceedings, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, is the same as that prescribed for civil proceedings.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 268, § 4.

19-03.1-36.4.
Answer by claimant of property — Time for filing.

Within twenty days after the service of the summons and complaint for forfeiture, the owner of the property to be forfeited and any other person with a legal interest in the property may file an answer claiming an interest in that property and claiming that person’s interest is not subject to forfeiture under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 268, § 5.

Collateral References.

Effect of forfeiture proceedings under uniform controlled substances act or similar statute on lien against property subject to forfeiture, 1 A.L.R.5th 317.

Forfeitability of property, under uniform controlled substances act or similar statute, where property or evidence supporting forfeiture was illegally seized, 1 A.L.R.5th 346.

Application of forfeiture provisions of uniform controlled substances act or similar statute where drugs were possessed for personal use, 1 A.L.R.5th 375.

19-03.1-36.5.
Disposition of property if no answer filed.

If at the end of twenty days after the summons and complaint have been served there is no answer filed with the court against the complaint for forfeiture, the court shall order the forfeiture and disposition of the property as prayed for in the complaint.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 268, § 6.

19-03.1-36.6.
Hearing on contested forfeiture — Order releasing or forfeiting property.

If an answer is filed within the time limits in this chapter, the forfeiture proceedings must be set for hearing before the court. At the hearing, the state shall establish a valid seizure of the property to be forfeited, and the property meets the requirements of subsection 2 of section 19-03.1-36.2. Following the state’s case, any owner or person with a legal interest in the property to be forfeited who has filed an answer to the complaint has the burden of proving that the property to be forfeited is not subject to forfeiture under this chapter. If the court finds that the property is not subject to forfeiture under this chapter, the court shall order the property released to the owner or other person with a legal interest in the property as that person’s right, title, or interest appears. The court shall order the property forfeited if it determines that such property or an interest therein is subject to forfeiture.

A court ordering property forfeited under subsection 1 may order only the forfeited property or proceeds from the sale of forfeited property to be deposited with a political subdivision if the political subdivision has created a civil asset forfeiture fund. If the political subdivision does not have a civil asset forfeiture fund, any forfeited property and proceeds from the sale of forfeited property must be deposited in the attorney general’s asset forfeiture fund.

A political subdivision that has a civil asset forfeiture fund shall establish an application process, including eligibility criteria, to accept and process applications from law enforcement agencies within the political subdivision’s jurisdiction for an appropriation from the civil asset forfeiture fund.

This section does not prohibit the state and a political subdivision from entering an agreement to divide forfeited property and the proceeds from the sale of forfeited property.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 268, § 7; 2019, ch. 189, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

19-03.1-36.7.
Legal interest in property.

A person alleging a bona fide legal interest in property to be forfeited must establish by a preponderance of the evidence that such legal interest existed at the time of seizure or taking of custody of the property. In the case of a claimed bona fide security interest in the property, the person claiming such interest must establish by a preponderance of the evidence that the security interest in the property to be forfeited existed or was of public record at the time of seizure or taking of custody of the property.

Upon a determination by the court that property is subject to forfeiture, the owner of the property to be forfeited or any other person with a legal interest in the property may petition the court to determine whether the forfeiture is unconstitutionally excessive.

A vehicle valued at less than two thousand dollars may not be forfeited unless the court finds the vehicle has been modified to conceal contraband or currency.

Real property constituting a homestead may not be forfeited.

In determining whether a forfeiture is excessive, the court shall consider all factors, including the fair market value of the property, the extent to which the owner or person participated in the offense, the extent to which the property was used or received in committing the offense, and the possible penalty that could be imposed for the alleged or committed offense subject to forfeiture.

The court may not consider the value of the property to the state in determining whether the forfeiture is unconstitutionally excessive.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 268, § 8; 2019, ch. 189, § 3, effective August 1, 2019.

19-03.1-36.8
Reporting.

As used in this section, “law enforcement agency” means a nonfederal public agency authorized by law or by a government agency or branch to enforce the law and to conduct or engage in investigations or prosecutions for violations of law, including the authority to conduct or engage in seizure and forfeiture of property or to collaborate with a federal agency under federal law to conduct or engage in seizure and forfeiture of property. The term includes a multijurisdictional task force.

Every civil forfeiture judgment issued by a district court must be made publicly available and include the following information in the findings of fact:

Case number of the forfeiture proceeding and the district court where the case was filed.

Location of the seizure, including whether the location was a residence or business or occurred during a traffic stop.

The crime with which the suspect was charged.

The disposition of the suspect’s criminal case.

Who filed a claim or counterclaim for the seized property, or whether there was a default in the litigation of the seized property.

Date the forfeiture order was issued.

Whether a forfeiture settlement agreement was reached.

The date and the final disposition of the property.

Estimated value of the forfeited property.

Estimate of the total costs accrued by the law enforcement agency for storage and disposal of the civilly forfeited property.

Amount of any attorney fees awarded to owners of seized and forfeited property.

Annually, any law enforcement agency that seizes property shall provide to the attorney general a completed civil asset forfeiture case report form for every seizure and the total value of the forfeited property held by the agency at the end of the reporting period.

By November first of each year, the attorney general shall submit to the legislative management and the governor a written report summarizing activity in the state for the preceding fiscal year, the type, approximate value, and disposition of any civilly forfeited property, and the amount of proceeds received.

Summary data and civilly forfeited property must be disaggregated by agency.

The attorney general shall make the report available on the attorney general’s website.

The report must include the case reports provided by the law enforcement agencies.

The attorney general may recover any costs under this section by withdrawing money from the asset forfeiture fund.

A law enforcement agency may use forfeiture proceeds to pay the costs of compiling and reporting data under this section.

The data and reports compiled under this section are public information and not exempt from disclosure.

The attorney general may require the reporting of additional information not specified in this section. The attorney general shall develop standard forms, processes, and deadlines for annual submission of forfeiture data by law enforcement agencies.

If a law enforcement agency fails to file a report within thirty days after the report is due, the attorney general may compel compliance by any means until the report is filed.

Any property seized with a value of less than fifty dollars is not required to be included in the written report submitted by the attorney general.

A state’s attorney may establish a minimum value amount for seizures in the interests of justice and efficient use of governmental resources in the state’s attorney’s jurisdiction. The minimum value amount may be based on the state’s attorney’s determination of the:

Type and number of occurrences of offenses that include the seizure of property; and

Average value of seized property less the costs to seize and forfeit the property.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 189, § 4, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 178, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

19-03.1-37.
Burden of proof — Liabilities.

It is not necessary for the state to negate any exemption or exception in this chapter in any complaint, information, indictment, or other pleading or in any trial, hearing, or other proceeding under this chapter. The burden of proof of any exemption or exception is upon the person claiming it.

In the absence of proof that a person is the duly authorized holder of an appropriate registration or order form issued under this chapter, the person is presumed not to be the holder of the registration or form. The burden of proof is upon the person to rebut the presumption.

No liability is imposed by this chapter upon any authorized state, county, or municipal officer engaged in the lawful performance of the officer’s duties.

In all prosecutions under this chapter, chapter 19-03.2, or chapter 19-03.4 involving the analysis of a substance or sample thereof, a certified copy of the analytical report signed by the director of the state crime laboratory or the director’s designee, or electronically posted by the director of the state crime laboratory or the director’s designee on the crime laboratory information management system and certified by a law enforcement officer or individual who has authorized access to the crime laboratory information management system through the criminal justice data information sharing system, must be accepted as prima facie evidence of the results of the analytical findings.

Superseded by N.D.R.Ev, Rule 707.

In all cases of conspiracy to violate chapter 19-03.1, 19-03.2, or 19-03.4, the state is not required to prove or establish that a conspirator knew the other person to the agreement intended to deliver or possess with intent to deliver a controlled substance, an imitation controlled substance, or drug paraphernalia to a third person.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 37; 1975, ch. 196, § 1; 1985, ch. 258, § 27; 1987, ch. 263, § 11; 1989, ch. 266, § 7; 1993, ch. 218, § 3; 1993, ch. 220, § 5; 1993, ch. 222, § 1; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 1997, ch. 206, § 1; 2001, ch. 214, §§ 7, 8; 2003, ch. 469, § 2; 2005, ch. 195, § 1; 2015, ch. 168, § 2, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 168, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

19-03.1-38.
Judicial review.

All final determinations, findings, and conclusions of the board under this chapter are final and conclusive decisions of the matters involved. Any person aggrieved by the decision may obtain review of the decision in the district court. Findings of fact by the board, if supported by substantial evidence, are conclusive.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 38; 1985, ch. 262, § 24.